New Jersey, session 221, S3472.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 11. Section 3 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in sections 1 through 27 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 through C.58:11B-27), sections 23 through 27 of P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1, C.58:11B-20.1, C.58:11B-21.1, C.58:11B-22.1, and C.58:11B-22.2), and sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4): "Aviation project" means a project to develop or improve county or municipal airport facilities, or airport facilities owned or operated by a regional transportation authority that is not a bi-state authority, and related infrastructure or capital equipment, including, but not limited to, any design, planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, relocation, installation, removal, repair, or rehabilitation project that facilitates, increases the efficiency of, or improves the capacity for inter-modal trade for commercial and industrial facilities that are part of airport facilities. "Aviation project" includes, but is not limited to, any project to develop or improve terminal facilities designed for public use and for the transportation of persons or property, such as airports, runways, berms, basins, storage places, sheds, warehouses, and related infrastructure; "Bonds" means bonds issued by the trust pursuant to P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.); "Combined sewer overflow" means the discharge of untreated or partially treated stormwater runoff and wastewater from a combined sewer system into a body of water; "Combined sewer system" means a sewer system designed to carry sanitary wastewater at all times, which is also designed to collect and transport stormwater runoff from streets and other sources, thereby serving a combined purpose; "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of the Department of Environmental Protection; "Cost" means the cost of all labor, materials, machinery and equipment, lands, property, rights and easements, financing charges, interest on bonds, notes or other obligations, plans and specifications, surveys or estimates of costs and revenues, engineering and legal services, and all other expenses necessary or incident to all or part of an environmental infrastructure project; "Department" means the Department of Environmental Protection; "Environmental infrastructure project" means the acquisition, construction, improvement, repair or reconstruction of all or part of any structure, facility or equipment, or real or personal property necessary for or ancillary to any: (1) wastewater treatment system project, including any stormwater management or combined sewer overflow abatement projects; or (2) water supply project, as authorized pursuant to P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), including any water resources project, as authorized pursuant to P.L.2003, c.162; "Federal infrastructure bank program" means the United States Department of Transportation State Infrastructure Bank Program provided for in section 350 of Pub.L.104-59 and Pub.L.102-240 as amended or superseded; "Local government unit" means (1) a State authority, county, municipality, municipal, county or regional sewerage or utility authority, municipal sewerage district, joint meeting, improvement authority, or any other political subdivision of the State authorized to construct, operate, and maintain wastewater treatment systems; (2) a State authority, district water supply commission, county, municipality, municipal, county or regional utilities authority, municipal water district, joint meeting, or any other political subdivision of the State authorized pursuant to law to operate or maintain a public water supply system or to construct, rehabilitate, operate, or maintain water supply facilities or otherwise provide water for human consumption; (3) a county, municipality, municipal, county or regional transportation authority, or any other political subdivision of the State authorized to construct, operate, or maintain public highways or transportation projects; (4) a county, municipality, or other political subdivision or instrumentality of the State, or a municipal, county, or State authority that is not a bi-state authority, authorized to construct, operate, or maintain ports or marine projects; (5) a county, municipality, municipal or regional transportation authority, or other political subdivision or instrumentality of the State authorized to construct, operate, or maintain airports or aviation projects; or (6) a local government unit as defined in section 2 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.4) authorized to receive funds pursuant to the "Safeguarding Tomorrow Through Ongoing Risk Mitigation (STORM) Act," Pub.L. 116-284 (42 U.S.C. s. 5135), as amended or supplemented, and P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.); "Marine project" means a project to develop or improve public port or terminal facilities, and related infrastructure or capital equipment, including, but not limited to, any design, planning, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, relocation, installation, removal, repair, or rehabilitation project that facilitates, increases the efficiency of, or improves the capacity for inter-modal trade and cargo movement for commercial or industrial facilities that are part of port or terminal facilities.  "Marine project" includes, but is not limited to, dredging, soil hardening, and paving of the port facilities, and ferry terminal facilities designed for public use and the transportation of persons or property such as water craft, docks, wharves, piers, slips, storage places, sheds, warehouses, and related infrastructure.  "Marine project" shall not include any project that relates to or supports recreational or commercial boating activities; "New Jersey Environmental Infrastructure Financing Program" means the financing program to fund environmental infrastructure projects; "New Jersey Transportation Infrastructure Financing Program" means the financing program to fund transportation projects, aviation projects, and marine projects; "Notes" means notes issued by the trust pursuant to P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), or sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4); "Onsite wastewater treatment and disposal system" means an on-site system designed to treat and dispose of domestic sewage; "Other assistance" means forms of financial assistance, in addition to loans, authorized by the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank from the State Transportation Infrastructure Bank Fund, the wastewater treatment system general loan fund, the water supply facilities general loan fund, or the Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program Revolving Loan Fund established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-10.6), including, but not limited to, use of funds to: provide credit enhancements; serve as a capital reserve for bond or other debt instrument financing; subsidize interest rates; ensure the issuance of letters of credit and credit instruments; finance purchase and lease agreements with respect to transit projects; and provide bond or other debt financing instrument security; "Planning, design, and construction loan" means a short-term or temporary loan for eligible costs incurred in project planning, engineering design, or construction issued before or during the planning stage of a project; "Project" means the acquisition, construction, improvement, repair or reconstruction of all or part of any structure, facility, or equipment, or real or personal property necessary for or ancillary to any: (1) wastewater treatment system project, including any stormwater management or combined sewer overflow abatement projects; (2) water supply project, as authorized pursuant to P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), including any water resources project, as authorized pursuant to P.L.2003, c.162; or (3) transportation project, aviation project, or marine project authorized pursuant to sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4); "Public highway" means public roads, streets, expressways, freeways, parkways, motorways and boulevards, including bridges, tunnels, overpasses, underpasses, interchanges, express bus roadways, bus pullouts and turnarounds, park-ride facilities, traffic circles, grade separations, traffic control devices, the elimination or improvement of crossings of railroads and highways, whether at-grade or not at-grade, bicycle and pedestrian pathways and pedestrian and bicycle bridges, and any property, rights of way, easements and interests therein needed for the construction, improvement, and maintenance of highways; "Public water utility" means any investor-owned water company or small water company; "Small water company" means any company, purveyor or entity, other than a governmental agency, that provides water for human consumption and which regularly serves less than 1,000 customer connections, including nonprofit, noncommunity water systems owned or operated by a nonprofit group or organization; "Stormwater management system" means any equipment, plants, structures, machinery, apparatus, management practices, or land, or any combination thereof, acquired, used, constructed, implemented or operated to prevent nonpoint source pollution, abate improper cross-connections and interconnections between stormwater and sewer systems, minimize stormwater runoff, reduce soil erosion, or induce groundwater recharge, or any combination thereof; "Transportation project" means a capital project for public highways, approach roadways and other necessary land-side improvements, ramps, signal systems, roadbeds, transit lanes or rights of way, related transmission and distribution lines, pedestrian walkways and bridges connecting to passenger stations and servicing facilities, bridges, and grade crossings; "Trust" means the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank created pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-4); "Wastewater" means residential, commercial, industrial, or agricultural liquid waste, sewage, septage, stormwater runoff, or any combination thereof, or other liquid residue discharged or collected into a sewer system or stormwater management system, or any combination thereof; "Wastewater treatment system" means any equipment, plants, structures, machinery, apparatus, or land, or any combination thereof, acquired, used, constructed or operated by, or on behalf of, a local government unit for the storage, collection, reduction, recycling, reclamation, disposal, separation, or other treatment of wastewater or sewage sludge, or for the collection or treatment, or both, of stormwater runoff and wastewater, or for the final disposal of residues resulting from the treatment of wastewater, including, but not limited to, pumping and ventilating stations, treatment plants and works, connections, outfall sewers, interceptors, trunk lines, stormwater management systems, and other personal property and appurtenances necessary for their use or operation; "wastewater treatment system" shall include a stormwater management system or a combined sewer system; "Wastewater treatment system project" means any work relating to the acquisition, construction, improvement, repair or reconstruction of all or part of any structure, facility or equipment, or real or personal property necessary for or ancillary to any wastewater treatment system that meets the requirements set forth in sections 20, 21, and 22 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-20, C.58:11B-21, and C.58:11B-22); or any work relating to any of the stormwater management or combined sewer overflow abatement projects identified in the stormwater management and combined sewer overflow abatement project priority list adopted by the commissioner pursuant to section 28 of P.L.1989, c.181; or any work relating to the purposes set forth in section 6 of P.L.2003, c.162; or any work relating to any other project eligible for financing under the "Federal Water Pollution Control Act Amendments of 1972" (33 U.S.C. s.1251 et seq.), or any amendatory or supplementary acts thereto; "Water resources project" means any work related to transferring water between public water systems during a state of water emergency, to avert a drought emergency in all or any part of the State, to plan, design or construct interconnections of existing water supplies, or to extend water supplies to areas with contaminated ground water supplies; "Water supply facilities" means and refers to the real property and the plants, structures, interconnections between existing water supply facilities, machinery and equipment and other property, real, personal and mixed, acquired, constructed or operated, or to be acquired, constructed or operated, in whole or in part, by or on behalf of a public water utility, or by or on behalf of the State or a local government unit, for the purpose of augmenting the natural water resources of the State and making available an increased supply of water for all uses, or of conserving existing water resources, and any and all appurtenances necessary, useful or convenient for the collecting, impounding, storing, improving, treating, filtering, conserving or transmitting of water, and for the preservation and protection of these resources and facilities, whether in public or private ownership, and providing for the conservation and development of future water supply resources, and facilitating incidental recreational uses thereof; "Water supply project" means any work relating to the acquisition, construction, improvement, repair or reconstruction of all or part of any structure, facility or equipment, or real or personal property necessary for or ancillary to water supply facilities that meets the requirements set forth in sections 24, 25, and 26 of P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-20.1, C.58:11B-21.1, and C.58:11B-22.1); or any work relating to the purposes set forth in section 4 of P.L.1981, c.261; or any work relating to the purposes set forth in section 6 of P.L.2003, c.162; or any work relating to any other project eligible for funding pursuant to the federal "Safe Drinking Water Act Amendments of 1996," Pub.L.104-182, and any amendatory and supplementary acts thereto.1 (cf: P.L.2023, c.63, s.10) 1[1.] 2.1  Section 5 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-5a) is amended to read as follows: 5.  a.  In addition to its powers and duties set forth in P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), and sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4), the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank shall establish a "Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program" to fund hazard mitigation and resilience projects undertaken by the State, local government units, and nonprofit organizations in accordance with the provisions of the STORM Act and sections 1 through 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.). b.    Except as otherwise provided in sections 1 through 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.), the Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program shall comply with all provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), unless such provision is specifically related to environmental infrastructure or transportation projects as defined in section 3 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-3). In establishing this program and issuing bonds pursuant to sections 1 through 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.), the bank shall have the same powers and duties set forth in the "New Jersey Infrastructure Trust Act," P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.).  The bank shall borrow money and issue bonds, notes, and other obligations, and secure the same, and provide for the rights of the holders thereof in the same manner as provided pursuant to P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.).  Each loan to a local government unit or any other person shall be evidenced by notes, bonds, or other obligations thereof issued to the trust.  In the case of a local government unit, a note or bond to be issued to the trust by the local government unit (1) shall be authorized and issued as provided by law for the issuance of notes and bonds by the local government unit, (2) notwithstanding any provisions of the Local Authorities Fiscal Control Law, P.L.1983, c.313 (C.40A:5A-1 et seq.) to the contrary, shall be approved by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs, and (3) notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.40A:2-27, N.J.S.40A:2-28 and N.J.S.40A:2-29 or any other provisions of law to the contrary, may be sold at private sale to the trust or the State, as the case may be, at any price, whether or not less than par value, and shall be subject to redemption prior to maturity at any time and at any price as the trust and the local government unit may agree. c.     The bank shall make and contract to make loans and provide other assistance to State entities, local government units, and nonprofit organizations to finance the cost of hazard mitigation and resilience projects in accordance with the provisions of the STORM Act and sections 1 through 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.) and acquire and contract to acquire notes, bonds or other obligations issued or to be issued by any local government units to evidence the loans, all in accordance with the provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.).  The loans shall be made subject to those terms and conditions as the bank shall determine to be consistent with the purposes of the STORM Act and sections 1 through 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.).  [Each] Except for short-term or temporary loans, each loan by the bank and the terms and conditions thereof shall be subject to approval by the State Treasurer, and the bank shall make available to the State Treasurer all information, statistical data, and reports of independent consultants or experts as the State Treasurer shall deem necessary in order to evaluate the loan. (cf: P.L.2023, c.63, s.5) 1[2.] 3.1  Section 6 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-6) is amended to read as follows: 6.  a.  Except as may be otherwise expressly provided in the provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), or sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4), the trust may from time to time issue its bonds, notes, or other obligations in any principal amounts as in the judgment of the trust shall be necessary to provide sufficient funds for any of its corporate purposes, including the payment, funding, or refunding of the principal of, or interest or redemption premiums on, any bonds, notes, or other obligations issued by it, whether the bonds, notes, or other obligations or the interest or redemption premiums thereon to be funded or refunded have or have not become due, the establishment or increase of reserves or other funds to secure or to pay the bonds, notes, or other obligations or interest thereon and all other costs or expenses of the trust incident to and necessary to carry out its corporate purposes and powers. b.    Whether or not the bonds, notes or other obligations of the trust are of a form and character as to be negotiable instruments under the terms of Title 12A of the New Jersey Statutes, the bonds, notes and other obligations are made negotiable instruments within the meaning of and for the purposes of Title 12A of the New Jersey Statutes, subject only to the provisions of the bonds, notes and other obligations for registration. c.     Bonds, notes or other obligations of the trust shall be authorized by a resolution or resolutions of the trust and may be issued in one or more series and shall bear any date or dates, mature at any time or times, bear interest at any rate or rates of interest per annum, be in any denomination or denominations, be in any form, either coupon, registered or book entry, carry any conversion or registration privileges, have any rank or priority, be executed in any manner, be payable in any coin or currency of the United States which at the time of payment is legal tender for the payment of public and private debts, at any place or places within or without the State, and be subject to any terms of redemption by the trust or the holders thereof, with or without premium, as the resolution or resolutions may provide. A resolution of the trust authorizing the issuance of bonds, notes or other obligations may provide that the bonds, notes or other obligations be secured by a trust indenture between the trust and a trustee, vesting in the trustee any property, rights, powers and duties in trust consistent with the provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), or sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4) as the trust may determine. d.    Bonds, notes or other obligations of the trust may be sold at any price or prices and in any manner as the trust may determine.  Notwithstanding any provisions of the "Local Bond Law," N.J.S.40A:2-1 et seq., to the contrary, each bond, note, or other obligation of the trust, and each bond, note, or other obligation of a local government unit, public water utility, or other person, issued to the trust to evidence the loan issued to the trust, or, if applicable, issued to the State, acting by and through the Department of Environmental Protection, to evidence a loan issued thereby, pursuant to subsection a. of section 9 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-9), shall mature and be paid not later than 30 years for environmental infrastructure projects, 45 years for combined sewer overflow projects, 31 years for transportation projects, aviation projects, and marine projects, and 30 years for hazard mitigation and resilience projects pursuant to sections 1 through 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.), from the effective date thereof, or the certified useful life of the project or projects to be financed by the bonds, notes, or other obligations, whichever is less, or a shorter period of time as may be applicable to any companion loan made concurrently with the loan made by the trust and issued pursuant to federal law or regulation. Notwithstanding the provisions of the "Local Bond Law," N.J.S.40A:2-1 et seq., or this subsection, to the contrary, each bond, note, or other obligation of the trust, and each bond, note, or other obligation of a local government unit, public water utility, or other person, issued to the trust to evidence the loan issued to the trust, or, if applicable, issued to the State, acting by and through the Department of Environmental Protection, to evidence a loan issued thereby, pursuant to subsection a. of section 9 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-9), and issued in connection with funding provided pursuant to the "Water Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act of 2014" (WIFIA), 33 U.S.C. s.3901 et seq., as amended and supplemented, the "Transportation Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act of 1998" (TIFIA), 23 U.S.C. s.601 et seq., as amended and supplemented, or the "Safeguarding Tomorrow Through Ongoing Risk Mitigation (STORM) Act," Pub.L. 116-284 (42 U.S.C. s. 5135), as amended or supplemented, shall mature and be paid not later than the maximum time period allowed by those federal acts. All bonds of the trust shall be sold at public or private sale at the price or prices and in the manner as the trust shall determine, either on a negotiated or on a competitive basis. If competitively sold, bonds shall be sold after notice of sale, a summary of which shall be published at least once in at least three newspapers published in the State of New Jersey and at least once in a publication carrying municipal bond notices and devoted primarily to financial news published in New Jersey or the city of New York, the first summary notice to be at least five days prior to the day of bidding.  The notice of sale may contain a provision to the effect that any or all bids made in pursuance thereof may be rejected. In the event of such rejection or of failure to receive any acceptable bid, the trust, at any time within 60 days from the date of such advertised sale, may sell such bonds at private sale upon terms not less favorable to the State than the terms offered by any rejected bid.  The trust may sell all or part of the bonds of any series as issued to any State fund or to the federal government or any agency thereof, at private sale, without advertisement. e.     Bonds, notes or other obligations of the trust may be issued under the provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), or sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4) without obtaining the consent of any department, division, board, bureau or agency of the State, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things, other than those consents, proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), or sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4). f.     Bonds, notes or other obligations of the trust issued under the provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), or sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4) shall not be a debt or liability of the State or of any political subdivision thereof other than the trust and shall not create or constitute any indebtedness, liability or obligation of the State or any political subdivision, but all these bonds, notes and other obligations, unless funded or refunded by bonds, notes or other obligations, shall be payable solely from revenues or funds pledged or available for their payment as authorized in P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), or sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4). Each bond, note and obligation shall contain on its face a statement to the effect that the trust is obligated to pay the principal thereof or the interest thereon only from its revenues, receipts or funds pledged or available for their payment as authorized in P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), or sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4), and that neither the State, nor any political subdivision thereof, is obligated to pay the principal or interest and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State, or any political subdivision thereof, is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bonds, notes or other obligations. g.    The aggregate principal amount of bonds, notes or other obligations, including subordinated indebtedness of the trust, shall not exceed (1) $5,000,000,000 with respect to bonds, notes, or other obligations issued to finance the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2013, c.93 (C.58:11B-9.5), and (2) $5,000,000,000 with respect to bonds, notes, or other obligations issued for all other purposes of the trust. In computing the foregoing limitations there shall be excluded all the bonds, notes or other obligations, including subordinated indebtedness of the trust, which shall be issued for refunding purposes, whenever the refunding shall be determined to result in a savings. (1) Upon the decision by the trust to issue refunding bonds, except for current refunding, and prior to the sale of those bonds, the trust shall transmit to the Joint Budget Oversight Committee, or its successor, a report that a decision has been made, reciting the basis on which the decision was made, including an estimate of the debt service savings to be achieved and the calculations upon which the trust relied when making the decision to issue refunding bonds. The report shall also disclose the intent of the trust to issue and sell the refunding bonds at public or private sale and the reasons therefor. (2) The Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor shall have the authority to approve or disapprove the sales of refunding bonds as included in each report submitted in accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection. The committee shall notify the trust in writing of the approval or disapproval within 30 days of receipt of the report. Should the committee not act within 30 days of receipt of the report, the trust may proceed with the sale of the refunding bonds, provided that the sale of refunding bonds shall realize not less than three percent net present value debt service savings. (3) No refunding bonds shall be issued unless the report has been submitted to and approved by the Joint Budget Oversight Committee or its successor as set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection. (4) Within 30 days after the sale of the refunding bonds, the trust shall notify the committee of the result of that sale, including the prices and terms, conditions and regulations concerning the refunding bonds, the actual amount of debt service savings to be realized as a result of the sale of refunding bonds, and the intended use of the proceeds from the sale of those bonds. (5) The committee shall review all information and reports submitted in accordance with this subsection and may, on its own initiative, make observations to the trust, or to the Legislature, or both, as it deems appropriate. h.    Each issue of bonds, notes, or other obligations of the trust may, if it is determined by the trust, be general obligations thereof payable out of any revenues, receipts or funds of the trust, or special obligations thereof payable out of particular revenues, receipts or funds, subject only to any agreements with the holders of bonds, notes or other obligations, and may be secured by one or more of the following: (1) Pledge of revenues and other receipts to be derived from the payment of the interest on and principal of notes, bonds or other obligations issued to the trust by one or more local government units, public water utilities, or other persons, and any other payment made to the trust pursuant to agreements with any local government units, public water utilities, or other persons, or a pledge or assignment of any notes, bonds, or other obligations of any local government unit public water utilities, or other persons and the rights and interest of the trust therein; (2) Pledge of rentals, receipts and other revenues to be derived from leases or other contractual arrangements with any person or entity, public or private, including one or more local government units, public water utilities, or other persons, or a pledge or assignment of those leases or other contractual arrangements and the rights and interest of the trust therein; (3) Pledge of all moneys, funds, accounts, securities and other funds, including the proceeds of the bonds, notes or other obligations; (4) Pledge of the receipts to be derived from the payments of State aid, payable to the trust pursuant to section 12 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-12); (5) A mortgage on all or any part of the property, real or personal, of the trust then owned or thereafter to be acquired, or a pledge or assignment of mortgages made to the trust by any person or entity, public or private, including one or more local government units, public water utilities, or other persons, and the rights and interest of the trust therein. i.     The trust shall not issue any bonds, notes or other obligations, or otherwise incur any additional indebtedness, on or after June 30, [2033] 2053 . j.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.1996, c.88). (cf: P.L.2023, c.63, s.12) 1[3.] 4.1  Section 9 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-9) is amended to read as follows: 9.  a. (1) The trust may make and contract to make loans to local government units, or to a local government unit on behalf of another local government unit, in accordance with and subject to the provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.) to finance the cost of any wastewater treatment system project or water supply project, which the local government unit may lawfully undertake or acquire and for which the local government unit is authorized by law to borrow money. (2) The trust may make and contract to make loans to public water utilities, or to any other person or local government unit on behalf of a public water utility, in accordance with and subject to the provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.) to finance the cost of any water supply project, which the public water utility may lawfully undertake or acquire. (3) The trust may make and contract to make loans to private persons other than local government units, or to any other person or local government unit on behalf of a private person, in accordance with and subject to the provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.) to finance the cost of onsite wastewater treatment and disposal systems or stormwater management systems. (4) The trust may make and contract to make loans and provide other assistance to a local government unit or consortia thereof to finance the cost of transportation projects, aviation projects, and marine projects pursuant to sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4), and provided that the federally-funded transportation subaccount is operated in accordance with the provisions of the federal infrastructure bank program. The loans may be made subject to those terms and conditions as the trust shall determine to be consistent with the purposes thereof.  [Each] Except for short-term or temporary loans, each loan by the trust and the terms and conditions thereof shall be subject to approval by the State Treasurer, and the trust shall make available to the State Treasurer all information, statistical data and reports of independent consultants or experts as the State Treasurer shall deem necessary in order to evaluate the loan. Each loan to a local government unit, public water utility or any other person shall be evidenced by notes, bonds or other obligations thereof issued to the trust.  In the case of each local government unit, notes and bonds to be issued to the trust and, if applicable, the State, acting by and through the Department of Environmental Protection, by the local government unit (1) shall be authorized and issued as provided by law for the issuance of notes and bonds by the local government unit, (2) notwithstanding any provisions of the "Local Authorities Fiscal Control Law," P.L.1983, c.313 (C.40A:5A-1 et seq.) to the contrary, shall be approved by the Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs, and (3) notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.40A:2-27, N.J.S.40A:2-28 and N.J.S.40A:2-29 or any other provisions of law to the contrary, may be sold at private sale to the trust or the State, as the case may be, at any price, whether or not less than par value, and shall be subject to redemption prior to maturity at any times and at any prices as the trust or the State, as the case may be, and local government units may agree. Each loan to a local government unit, public water utility or any other person and the notes, bonds or other obligations thereby issued shall bear interest at a rate or rates per annum as the trust or the State, as the case may be, and the local government unit, public water utility or any other person, as the case may be, may agree. b.    The trust is authorized to guarantee or contract to guarantee the payment of all or any portion of the principal and interest on bonds, notes or other obligations issued by a local government unit, public water utility, or other person, to finance, as applicable, the cost of any wastewater treatment system project, water supply project, transportation project, aviation project, or marine project, or redevelopment project that includes, as a portion thereof, any wastewater treatment system project, water supply project, transportation project, aviation project, marine project, or hazard mitigation and resilience project as defined in section 2 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.4), which the local government unit, public water utility, or other person may lawfully undertake or acquire and for which the local government unit is authorized by law to borrow money, and the guarantee shall constitute an obligation of the trust, and shall be in furtherance of the corporate purposes of the trust, for the purposes of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), or sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4). Each guarantee by the trust and the terms and conditions thereof shall be subject to approval by the State Treasurer, and the trust shall make available to the State Treasurer all information, statistical data and reports of independent consultants or experts as the State Treasurer shall deem necessary in order to evaluate the guarantee. c.     The trust shall not make or contract to make any loans or guarantees to local government units, public water utilities or any other person, or otherwise incur any additional indebtedness, on or after June 30, 2053. d.    Notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.) to the contrary, the trust may receive funds from any source including, without limitation, any funds drawn by the trust from a revolving line of credit or other similar financial vehicle that may be procured by the trust, either through a competitive or negotiated process, pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-5), for deposit into the Interim Environmental Financing Program Fund or the trust may issue its bonds, notes or other obligations, including commercial paper issued through a competitive or negotiated process, in any principal amounts, in either case, as in the judgment of the trust shall be necessary to provide sufficient funds to finance or refinance short-term or temporary loans to local government units, public water utilities or private persons for any wastewater treatment system projects included on the Department of Environmental Protection project priority list and eligible for approval pursuant to section 20 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-20) or water supply projects included on the Department of Environmental Protection project priority list and eligible for approval pursuant to section 24 of P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-20.1), as applicable, without regard to any other provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), including, without limitation, any administrative or legislative approvals. The trust shall create and establish a special fund to be known as the "Interim Environmental Financing Program Fund" for the short-term or temporary loan financing or refinancing program to be known as the "Interim Environmental Financing Program."  The monies in the fund shall be used for short-term or temporary loans for clean water and drinking water projects pursuant to the New Jersey Environmental Infrastructure Financing Program. Except as provided in section 1 of P.L.2013, c.93 (C.58:11B-9.5), any short-term or temporary loans made by the trust pursuant to this subsection may only be made in advance of the anticipated loans the trust may make and contract to make under the provisions of subsection a. of this section from any source of funds anticipated to be received by the trust.  Any such short-term or temporary loan made pursuant to the Interim Environmental Financing Program shall mature no later than the last day of the [third] fifth succeeding fiscal year following the closing date on which the short-term or temporary loan was made by the trust to the project sponsor; [except a planning, design, and construction loan shall mature no later than the last day of the fifth succeeding fiscal year following the closing date of the planning, design, and construction loan or the last day of the third succeeding fiscal year following the date of construction certification following the closing date of the planning, design, and construction loan, whichever is sooner, provided that, in either case, project planning or engineering design activities shall not exceed two years from the closing date of the planning, design, and construction loan; and] except a short-term or temporary loan made pursuant to this subsection for environmental planning and engineering design costs associated with long-term control plans for combined sewer overflow projects shall mature no later than the last day of the 10th succeeding fiscal year following the closing date on which the short-term or temporary loan was made by the trust to the project sponsor; and except a short-term or temporary loan made pursuant to this subsection which has been submitted as part of an application for funding pursuant to the "Water Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act of 2014" (WIFIA), 33 U.S.C. s.3901 et seq., as amended and supplemented, shall mature not later than the funding draw period allowed by this federal act.  Any short-term or temporary loan [or planning, design and construction loan] made by the trust pursuant to this subsection may mature in a shorter period of time as may be necessary to align with construction completion.  With respect to any short-term or temporary loan [or planning, design, and construction loan] made by the trust pursuant to this subsection, the trust may authorize one short-term supplemental loan for residual project expenses thereof upon receipt by the trust from the Department of Environmental Protection of a certification that states that the time required by the project sponsor to complete construction of the project exceeds the maximum maturity date of the project sponsor's outstanding short-term or temporary loan [or planning, design, and construction loan]. Any such short-term supplemental loan shall not exceed in duration the last day of the third succeeding fiscal year following the loan closing of the supplemental loan.  The trust may make short-term or temporary loans pursuant to the Interim Environmental Financing Program to any one or more of the project sponsors, for the respective projects thereof, identified in the interim financing project priority list to be known as the "Interim Environmental Financing Program Project Priority List" in the form provided to the Legislature by the Commissioner of Environmental Protection. The Interim Environmental Financing Program Project Priority List, including any revision thereof or supplement thereto, shall be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) at least once in each fiscal year as provided in section 20 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-20) and section 24 of P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-20.1).  The Secretary and the Clerk shall cause the date of submission to be entered upon the Senate Journal and the Minutes of the General Assembly, respectively. The trust may revise or supplement the Interim Environmental Financing Program Project Priority List no more than four times during the fiscal year and shall submit the revised list to the Legislature when the revisions are made.  Any environmental infrastructure project or the project sponsor thereof not identified in the Interim Environmental Financing Program Project Priority List shall not be eligible for a short-term or temporary loan from the Interim Environmental Financing Program Fund.  The trust may issue short-term or temporary loans pursuant to this subsection only if a project is listed on an Interim Environmental Financing Program Project Priority List that has been submitted to the Legislature.  No funds may be disbursed pursuant to this section for environmental infrastructure project activities prior to a determination and certification, in writing, from the Department of Environmental Protection, that the project activities satisfy the provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.). e.     Notwithstanding any provisions of the "Local Bond Law" (N.J.S.40A:2-1 et seq.), the "sewerage authorities law," P.L.1946, c.138 (C.40:14A-1 et seq.), or the "municipal and county utilities authorities law," P.L.1957, c.183 (C.40:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, short-term or temporary loans made by the trust pursuant to section 9 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-9) [or] , section 1 of P.L.2013, c.93 (C.58:11B-9.5), or section 6 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.5), and the obligations issued by project sponsors to evidence such loans, may, at the discretion of the trust and upon application by the project sponsor, bear interest at a variable rate determined pursuant to a methodology as may be established by the trust from time to time. Further, notwithstanding any provisions of the "Local Bond Law" (N.J.S.40A:2-1 et seq.), the "sewerage authorities law," P.L.1946, c.138 (C.40:14A-1 et seq.), or the "municipal and county utilities authorities law," P.L.1957, c.183 (C.40:14B-1 et seq.) to the contrary, any short-term or temporary loans made by the trust pursuant to section 9 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-9) [or] , section 1 of P.L.2013, c.93 (C.58:11B-9.5), or section 6 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.5), and any notes or other obligations issued by project sponsors to evidence such short-term or temporary loans, as such loans, notes, or other obligations may be refinanced or extended, as provided in subsections d. and g. of this section and section 1 of P.L.2013, c.93 (C.58:11B-9.5), except for loans for environmental planning and engineering design costs associated with long-term control plans for combined sewer overflow projects as provided in subsection d. of this section, shall mature no later than the maturity date as established pursuant to subsections d. and g. of this section and section 1 of P.L.2013, c.93 (C.58:11B-9.5), without payment by project sponsors of any portion of the principal thereof prior to maturity. f.     Any balances remaining in the Emergency Loan Fund established pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2007, c.138 (C.58:11B-9.1), the Planning and Design Fund established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2009, c.59 (C.58:11B-9.2), the Onsite Wastewater Disposal Loan Fund established pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2009, c.103 (C.58:11B-9.3), the Supplemental Loan Fund established pursuant to section 2 of P.L.2011, c.94 (C.58:11B-9.4), and the Equipment Loan Fund established pursuant to section 1 of P.L.2014, c.28 (C.58:11B-9.6) after the date of enactment of P.L.2016, c.30 shall be transferred to the Interim Environmental Financing Program Fund, and any loan repayments to the trust of principal and interest or premium on loans made from those funds shall be credited to the Interim Environmental Financing Program Fund. g.    The trust shall create and establish a special fund to be known as the "Interim Transportation Financing Program Fund" for the short-term or temporary loan financing or refinancing program to be known as the "Interim Transportation Financing Program." Notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.) to the contrary, the trust may receive funds from any source including, without limitation, any funds drawn by the trust from a revolving line of credit or other similar financial vehicle that may be procured by the trust, either through a competitive or negotiated process, pursuant to section 5 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-5), for deposit into the Interim Transportation Financing Program Fund or the trust may issue its bonds, notes or other obligations in any principal amounts, in either case, as in the judgment of the trust shall be necessary to provide sufficient funds to finance or refinance short-term or temporary loans to local government units or private persons for any transportation project, aviation project, or marine project included on the Department of Transportation Interim Transportation Financing Program Project Priority List for the ensuing fiscal year and eligible for approval pursuant to sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4), without regard to any other provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), or sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4), including, without limitation, any administrative or legislative approvals. Any short-term or temporary loans made by the trust pursuant to this subsection may only be made in advance of the anticipated loans the trust may make and contract to make under the provisions of subsection a. of this section from any source of funds anticipated to be received by the trust.  Any such short-term or temporary loan made pursuant to the Interim Transportation Financing Program shall mature no later than the last day of the [third] fifth succeeding fiscal year following the closing date on which the short-term or temporary loan was made by the trust to the project sponsor; [except a planning, design, and construction loan shall mature no later than the last day of the fifth succeeding fiscal year following the closing date of the planning, design, and construction loan or the last day of the third succeeding fiscal year following the date of construction certification following the closing date of the planning, design, and construction loan, and] except a short-term or temporary loan made pursuant to this subsection which has been submitted as part of an application for funding pursuant to the "Transportation Infrastructure Finance and Innovation Act of 1998" (TIFIA), 23 U.S.C. s.601 et seq., as amended and supplemented, shall mature not later than the funding draw period allowed by this federal act.  Any short-term or temporary loan [or planning, design and construction loan] made by the trust pursuant to this subsection may mature in a shorter period of time as may be necessary to align with construction completion [, whichever is sooner, provided that, in either case, project planning or engineering design activities shall not exceed two years from the closing date of the planning, design, and construction loan]. With respect to any short-term or temporary loan [or planning, design, and construction loan] made by the trust pursuant to this subsection, the trust may authorize one short-term supplemental loan for residual expenses thereof upon receipt by the trust from the Department of Transportation of a certification that states that the time required by the project sponsor to complete construction of the project exceeds the maximum maturity date of the short-term or temporary loan [or planning, design, and construction loan]. Any such short-term supplemental loan shall not exceed in duration the last day of the third succeeding fiscal year following the loan closing of the short-term supplemental loan.  The trust may make short-term or temporary loans pursuant to the Interim Transportation Financing Program to any one or more of the project sponsors, for the respective projects thereof, only if a project is identified in the Department of Transportation Interim Transportation Financing Program Project Priority List to be known as the "Interim Transportation Financing Program Project Priority List" in the form provided to the Legislature by the Commissioner of Transportation. The Interim Transportation Financing Program Project Priority List, including any revision thereof or supplement thereto, shall be submitted to the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the General Assembly on or before July 1 of each year.  The Interim Transportation Financing Program Project Priority List shall be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) at least once in each fiscal year.  The Secretary and the Clerk shall cause the date of submission to be entered upon the Senate Journal and the Minutes of the General Assembly, respectively. Any transportation infrastructure project or the project sponsor thereof not identified in the Interim Transportation Financing Program Project Priority List shall not be eligible for a short-term or temporary loan from the Interim Transportation Financing Program Fund.  The trust may revise or supplement the Interim Transportation Financing Program Project Priority List no more than four times during the fiscal year, and shall submit the revised list to the Legislature when the revisions are made. No funds may be disbursed pursuant to this subsection for transportation project, aviation project, or marine project activities prior to certification in writing, from the trust, that the project activities satisfy the provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), or sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4).  Construction activities for a transportation project shall also require written notification of award concurrence from the Department of Transportation prior to fund disbursement. (cf: P.L.2023, c.63, s.14) 1[4.] 5.1  Section 1 of P.L.2013, c.93 (C.58:11B-9.5) is amended to read as follows: 1.  a. The trust shall create and establish a special fund to be known as the "Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Fund" for the disaster relief emergency short-term or temporary loan program of the trust to be known as the "Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program." There shall be established within the fund two subaccounts: an environmental subaccount that shall be approved to receive environmental funds and finance environmental infrastructure projects; and a transportation subaccount that shall be approved to receive transportation funds and finance transportation projects, aviation projects, and marine projects. (1)   The environmental subaccount of the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Fund shall be credited with: (a)   moneys deposited in the environmental subaccount as administrative fees received by the trust pursuant to subsection o. of section 5 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-5) that are attributable to the Environmental Infrastructure Financing Program; (b)   moneys received by the trust as repayment of the principal of and the interest or premium on loans made from the environmental subaccount; (c)   any interest earnings received on the moneys in the environmental subaccount; (d)   such other moneys as the Legislature may appropriate to the trust for deposit into the environmental subaccount at any time to finance or refinance emergency short-term or temporary environmental infrastructure project loans pursuant to the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program; (e)   the proceeds of any bonds, notes or other obligations that may be issued by the trust from time to time in any principal amounts as in the judgment of the trust shall be necessary or appropriate to provide sufficient funds for deposit into the environmental subaccount to finance or refinance emergency short-term or temporary environmental infrastructure project loans pursuant to the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program; and (f)   any other source of available funds that may be deemed by the trust to be necessary or appropriate to provide sufficient funds for deposit into the environmental subaccount to finance or refinance emergency short-term or temporary environmental infrastructure project loans pursuant to the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program, including, without limitation, any funds drawn by the trust from (i) a revolving line of credit or other similar financial vehicle, or (ii) a commercial paper financing program, either through a competitive or negotiated process, that may be procured by the trust pursuant to the provisions of section 5 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-5), for deposit into the environmental subaccount to finance or refinance emergency short-term or temporary environmental infrastructure project loans pursuant to the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program. (2)   The transportation subaccount of the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Fund shall be credited with: (a)   moneys deposited in the transportation subaccount as administrative fees received by the trust pursuant to subsection o. of section 5 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-5) that are attributable to the Transportation Financing Program; (b)   moneys received by the trust as repayment of the principal of and the interest or premium on loans made from the transportation subaccount; (c)   any interest earnings received on the moneys in the transportation subaccount; (d)   such other moneys as the Legislature may appropriate to the trust for deposit into the transportation subaccount at any time to finance or refinance emergency short-term or temporary transportation loans pursuant to the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program; (e)   the proceeds of any bonds, notes or other obligations that may be issued by the trust from time to time in any principal amounts as in the judgment of the trust shall be necessary or appropriate to provide sufficient funds for deposit into the transportation subaccount to finance or refinance emergency short-term or temporary transportation loans pursuant to the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program; and (f)   any other source of available funds that may be deemed by the trust to be necessary or appropriate to provide sufficient funds for deposit into the transportation subaccount to finance or refinance emergency short-term or temporary transportation loans pursuant to the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program, including, without limitation, any funds drawn by the trust from (i) a revolving line of credit or other similar financial vehicle, or (ii) a commercial paper financing program, either through a competitive or negotiated process, that may be procured by the trust pursuant to the provisions of section 5 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-5). b.    Notwithstanding any provision of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4) to the contrary, the trust may make emergency short-term or temporary Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program loans to: (1) local government units to finance or refinance the costs incurred in the environmental planning and design associated with the wastewater treatment system projects, and to finance wastewater treatment system projects, as applicable; (2) local government units, public water utilities, or private persons to finance or refinance the costs incurred in the environmental planning and design of water supply projects, and to finance water supply projects, as applicable; or (3) local government units to finance or refinance the costs incurred in the planning and design associated with transportation projects, aviation projects, and marine projects, and to finance transportation projects, aviation projects, and marine projects, as applicable. Funds may only be disbursed for emergency short-term or temporary loans upon the determination and certification in writing by the Department of Environmental Protection for environmental infrastructure projects, and by the Department of Transportation for transportation projects, aviation projects, and marine projects, that any such project costs are necessary and appropriate to: repair damages to a wastewater treatment system, water supply facility, transportation system, airport facility, or marine port or terminal facility directly arising from an act of terrorism, seismic activity, weather conditions, or other emergency event that occurred within the three fiscal years after a declaration by the Governor of a state of emergency, provided the wastewater treatment system, water supply facility, transportation system, airport facility, or marine port or terminal facility is located in a county included in the Governor's state of emergency declaration; or mitigate the risk of future damage to a wastewater treatment system, water supply facility, transportation system, airport facility, or marine port or terminal facility, from an act of terrorism, seismic activity, weather conditions, or other emergency event comparable in scope and severity to the act of terrorism, seismic activity, weather conditions, or other emergency event that occurred within the three fiscal years after a declaration by the Governor of a state of emergency, provided the wastewater treatment system, water supply facility, transportation system, airport facility, or marine port or terminal facility is located in a county included in the Governor's state of emergency declaration, without regard to any other provisions of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.), P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), or sections 22 and 34 through 38 of P.L.2016, c.56 (C.58:11B-10.3 through C.58:11B-10.5, C.58:11B-20.2, C.58:11B-22.3, and C.58:11B-22.4), including, without limitation, the provisions of section 20 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-20), section 24 of P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-20.1), the Interim Environmental Financing Program Project Priority List pursuant to subsection d. of section 9 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-9), or the Interim Transportation Financing Program Project Priority List pursuant to subsection g. of section 9 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-9), or any administrative or legislative approvals. A project shall be eligible for emergency short-term or temporary loans pursuant to this section if it is identified on a Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Project Priority List no more than three years after the conditions that gave rise to a declaration by the Governor of a state of emergency.  Any such short-term or temporary loan pursuant to the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program shall mature no later than the last day of the [third] fifth succeeding fiscal year following the closing date on which the short-term or temporary loan was made by the trust to the project sponsor [; except a planning, design, and construction loan shall mature no later than the last day of the fifth succeeding fiscal year following the closing date of the planning, design, and construction loan or the last day of the third succeeding fiscal year following the date of construction certification following the closing date of the planning, design, and construction loan, whichever is sooner, provided that, in either case, project planning or engineering design activities shall not exceed two years from the closing date of the planning, design, and construction loan] .  With respect to any short-term or temporary loan [or planning, design, and construction loan] made by the trust pursuant to this subsection, the trust may authorize one short-term supplemental loan for residual project expenses thereof upon receipt by the trust from the Department of Environmental Protection or the Department of Transportation, as appropriate, of a certification that states that the time required by the project sponsor to complete construction of the project exceeds the maximum maturity date of the short-term or temporary loan [or planning, design, and construction loan] . Any such short-term supplemental loan shall not exceed in duration the last day of the third succeeding fiscal year following the loan closing of the short-term supplemental loan. c.     The trust may make short-term or temporary loans pursuant to the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program to one or more of the project sponsors, for the respective projects thereof, provided that the project is identified on the Environmental Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program project priority list to be known as the "Environmental Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Project Priority List" no later than three years after the date of the declaration by the Governor of a state of emergency in the form provided to the Legislature by the Commissioner of Environmental Protection, or the Transportation Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program project priority list to be known as the "Transportation Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Project Priority List" no later than three years after the date of the declaration by the Governor of a state of emergency in the form provided to the Legislature by the Commissioner of the Department of Transportation.  However, a project may be eligible for funding pursuant to this section more than three years after the date of the declaration by the Governor of a state of emergency if the project was first included on an Environmental Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Project Priority List or a Transportation Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Project Priority List within three years after the date of the declaration by the Governor of a state of emergency and continues to be identified on the Environmental Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Project Priority List or the Transportation Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Project Priority List in the fiscal year in which the funding is issued.  The Environmental Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Project Priority List and the Transportation Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Project Priority List shall be submitted to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) at least once in each fiscal year.  A project or a project sponsor thereof not identified on the Environmental Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Project Priority List or Transportation Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Project Priority List submitted to the Legislature shall not be eligible for a short-term or temporary loan from the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program Fund. d.    The trust shall submit a report on the Disaster Emergency Financing Program to the Legislature pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1) on or before January 15 of each year.  The Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the General Assembly shall cause the date of submission to be entered upon the Senate Journal and the Minutes of the General Assembly, respectively.  The report shall identify the environmental infrastructure projects, transportation projects, aviation projects, and marine projects financed during the prior fiscal year through the program including a project description, the amount of the Disaster Relief Emergency Financing Program loan provided for each project, and the duration of each loan. (cf: P.L.2021, c.74, s.5) 1[5.] 6.1  Section 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-10.8) is amended to read as follows: 8.  a. Monies in the Community Hazard Mitigation Assistance Program Revolving Loan Fund (1) shall be used in accordance with the provisions of the STORM Act and sections 1 through 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.) for the purpose of providing loans or other financial assistance for hazard mitigation and resilience projects undertaken by State entities, local government units, and nonprofit organizations, and (2) shall be supplemental to, and not intended to take the place of, funding that otherwise would be appropriated to State agencies, local government units, or nonprofit organizations for hazard mitigation  and resilience projects. b.    The bank may provide loans or other financial assistance from the fund to local government units and nonprofit organizations to (1) supplement, as allowable under federal law, rule, or regulation, funding received from other federal resilience grant programs, including the Building Resilient Infrastructures and Communities (BRIC) program, the Flood Mitigation Assistance (FMA) program, the Hazard Mitigation Grant Program (HMGP), and the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development's Community Development Block Grant Mitigation program, and (2) participate in the United States Army Corps of Engineers' Flood Risk Management Program. c.  (1) The bank may provide loans or other financial assistance from the fund to local government units for the purpose of establishing a program to provide loan funds to private property owners to use for hazard mitigation and resilience projects for a building. Hazard mitigation projects for private property owners shall include, but not be limited to, wind retrofit, flood mitigation elevation, floodproofing, fire retrofit mitigation, hurricane retrofit mitigation projects, and any other eligible projects pursuant to the STORM Act. (2) Repayment of a loan provided by a local government unit to a private property owner may be collected in the same manner as property taxes and shall be collateralized by a lien on the real property that is the site of the hazard mitigation and resilience project.  A property owner may sell property after receiving a loan pursuant to this subsection, provided that the property owner repays the loan. (3) To the extent permitted by federal law, a local government unit that provides loans to private property owners pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall establish a graduated loan forgiveness program that shall, at minimum: (a) provide full loan forgiveness for eligible households with income between 80 percent and 50 percent of the median income for the municipality in which the property to which the loan applies is located; (b) provide 50 percent loan forgiveness for eligible households with income between 80 percent to 100 percent of the median income for the municipality in which the property to which the loan applies is located; and (c) provide additional loan forgiveness percentages for households not covered by subparagraph (a) or (b) of this paragraph, based on: (i) the number of private property owners with loans issued pursuant to this subsection that are outstanding; (ii) the availability of funding; and (iii) any other factor that the local government unit, in consultation with the State Office of Emergency Management, finds reasonable and necessary. d.    The bank may provide grants or other financial assistance to nonprofit organizations for hazard mitigation and resilience projects. e.     The bank shall, taking into consideration and in accordance with the requirements of the STORM Act, establish, in consultation with the State Office of Emergency Management, application procedures and eligibility criteria for State entities, local government units, and nonprofit organizations to receive loans or other financial assistance from the fund.  The eligibility criteria shall require that an applicant demonstrate: (1) the need for the loan or other financial assistance to address hazard mitigation; and (2) the ability to repay the loan or other financial assistance, if required, at a later date. f.     Long-term loans provided from the fund shall be for a fixed loan period and shall comply with all applicable requirements of the STORM Act and any rules, regulations, or guidelines adopted by the Federal Emergency Management Agency governing funding provided pursuant to the STORM Act.  The bank shall establish terms for providing assistance from the fund, including short-term or temporary loans for planning, design, and construction, below-market interest rates, deferred payment schedules, and other provisions that will enable these funds to be used effectively. (cf: P.L.2023, c.63, s.8) 1[6.] 7.1  Section 2 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.4) is amended to read as follows: 2.    As used in sections 1 through 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.): "Bank" means the New Jersey Infrastructure Bank, created pursuant to section 4 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-4). "Bonds" mean the bonds issued, or authorized to be issued, by the bank pursuant to sections 1 through 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.) and in compliance with the bank's authority pursuant to, and subject to the same conditions as provided in, P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-1 et seq.) or P.L.1997, c.224 (C.58:11B-10.1 et al.), as applicable. "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Environmental Protection. "Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program" means the program established by the bank pursuant to sections 1 through 8 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-20.3 et al.). "Fund" means the Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program Revolving Loan Fund established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2023, c.63 (C.58:11B-10.6). "Hazard mitigation and resilience project" means a hazard mitigation and resilience project [identified on a State or local hazard mitigation plan,] undertaken by the State, a local government unit, or a nonprofit organization in accordance with the provisions of the STORM Act and a State or local hazard mitigation plan . "Loan origination fee" means the fee charged by the bank in connection with services provided to a sponsor of a hazard mitigation and resilience project pursuant to the sponsor's participation in the Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program.  A project sponsor may finance any portion of the loan origination fee through the bank by a hazard mitigation and resilience project assistance loan to pay a portion of the costs incurred by the bank in the implementation of the Community Hazard Assistance Mitigation Program. "Local government unit" means any county or municipality, or any agency, instrumentality, authority, or corporation of any county or municipality, or any other entity eligible to receive federal funds pursuant to the STORM Act. "Nonprofit organization" means a private nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal taxation pursuant to section 501 (c)(3) of the federal Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. s.501 (c)(3). "Other assistance" means the same as the same as the term is defined in section 3 of P.L.1985, c.334 (C.58:11B-3). "State Office of Emergency Management" means the Office of Emergency Management in the Division of State Police in the Department of Law and Public Safety. "STORM Act" means the "Safeguarding Tomorrow through Ongoing Risk Mitigation Act," Pub. L. 116-284, as amended or superseded, and any rules, regulations, or guidance adopted pursuant thereto by the Federal Emergency Management Agency. (cf: P.L.2023, c.63, s.2) 1[7.] 8.1  This act shall take effect immediately.